en: Chocolate coated waffles, Chocolate waffles, Soft waffle with chocolate, Brussels waffle with chocolate
fr: Gaufres nappées de chocolat, gaufre chocolatée, Gaufres au chocolat, Gauffre bruxelloise au chocolat, Gauffre de Bruxelles au chocolat
hr: Vafli obloženi čokoladom
nl: Wafels met chocola
pl: Gofry czekoladowe, gofry w czekoladzie
ro: Vafe cu ciocolată

en: Cocoa glaze coated waffles
fr: Gaufres nappées d'un glaçage au cacao, Gaufres au cacao

en: Stuffed waffles, Stroopwafels
de: gefüllte Waffeln
fi: Paksut täytetyt vohvelit
fr: Gaufres fourrées
hr: Punjene vafle
it: Waffle ripieni
nl: Gevulde wafels, Stroopwafels
ro: Vafe Umplute

en: Honey stuffed waffles, Honey stroopwafels
de: Honiggefüllte Waffeln, Waffeln mit Honig gefüllt
fr: Gaufres fourrées au miel, gaufres au miel
hr: Vafli punjeni medom
nl: Honing gevulde wafels
ro: Vafe umplute cu miere

en: Caramel stuffed waffles, caramel stroopwafels
fr: Gaufres fourrées au caramel

en: Wafers, waffers, wafer biscuit
bg: Вафли
de: Knusprige Waffeln
fi: vohvelit
fr: Gaufrettes, gaufrette
hr: Napolitanke
hu: Ostya, ostyák
it: Wafer
ja: ウエハース, ウェハース
nl: Wafeltjes
pl: Wafle, Wafelki
pt: Bolachas
ro: Napilitane, Napolitană, napolitane

en: Thin crunchy wafer biscuit with chocolate, Dry crunchy wafer biscuit with chocolate
de: Waffeln mit Schokoladenüberzug, Mit Schokolade überzogene Waffeln
fr: Gaufre croustillante fine chocolatée, Gaufre croustillante sèche chocolatée
hr: Tanki hrskavi oblatni biskvit sa čokoladom

en: Plain wafers, Wafer biscuit without filling
fr: Gaufrettes natures, Gaufrette sans fourrage, Eventail sans fourrage

de: Oblaten
pl: Oblaty

en: Stuffed wafers
bg: Вафли с пълнеж
de: Gefüllte Knusprige Waffeln
es: Obleas rellenas
fi: täytetyt vohvelit
fr: Gaufrettes fourrées
hr: Punjene oblatne
hu: Töltött ostya, Töltött ostyák
it: Wafer ripieni
nl: Gevulde wafeltjes
ro: Napolitane umplute

en: Caramel stuffed wafers
de: Knusprige Waffeln mit Karamellfüllung, Karamellgefüllte Knusprige Waffeln, Waffeln mit Karamell gefüllt
fi: kinuskilla täytetyt vohvelit
fr: Gaufrettes fourrées au caramel
hr: Oblatne nadjevene karamelom
hu: Karamellel töltött ostyák
it: Wafer ripieni di caramello
ro: Napolitane umplute cu caramel, Napolitane cu caramel

en: Chocolate stuffed wafers
de: Knusprige Waffeln mit Schokoladenfüllung, Knusprige Waffeln gefüllt mit Schokolade
fi: suklaalla täytetyt vohvelit
fr: Gaufrettes fourrées au chocolat, Gaufrette fourrée au chocolat
hr: Napolitanke punjene čokoladom
hu: Csokoládéval töltött ostya
it: Wafer ripieni di cioccolato
nl: Wafeltjes gevuld met chocola
ro: Napolitane umplute cu ciocolată, Napolitane cu ciocolată

en: Vanilla stuffed wafers, Vanilla flavoured wafer biscuit
de: Knusprige Waffeln mit Vanillefüllung, Vanille-gefüllte Knusprige Waffeln
fi: vaniljalla täytetyt vohvelit
fr: Gaufrettes fourrés vanille, Gaufrettes fourrées à la vanille, Gaufrette fourrée vanille
hr: Oblatne nadjevene vanilijom
hu: Vaníliával töltött ostyák
it: Wafer ripieni di vaniglia, Wafer alla vaniglia
nl: Wafeltjes met vanille
ro: Napolitane umplute cu vanilie, Napolitane cu vanilie

en: Hazelnut cream stuffed wafers
de: Knusprige Waffeln mit Haselnusscremefüllung
fr: Gaufrettes fourrées chocolat noisettes, Gaufrettes fourrées noisette, Gaufrettes fourrées aux fruits à coques
hr: Oblatne nadjevene kremom od lješnjaka

en: Fruits stuffed wafers, Stuffed fruits wafers
fr: Gaufrettes fourrées aux fruits, Gaufrette fourrée aux fruits
hr: Oblatne punjene voćem
hu: Töltött gyümölcs ostyák
nl: Vruchtenwafeltjes

en: Toaster pastries, Toaster pastry
de: Toastergebäck
fr: Grillardises
hr: Toster pecivo
nl: Pop tarts
ro: Produse de patiserie, Produs de patiserie

en: Plant-based foods and beverages
af: Plantgebaseerde kosse en drankies
ar: الأطعمة والمشروبات النباتية
az: Bitki mənşəli qidalar və içkilər
be: Раслінныя прадукты і напоі
bg: Растителни храни и напитки
bn: উদ্ভিদ-ভিত্তিক খাবার ও পানীয়
ca: Aliments i begudes amb base vegetal
cs: Rostlinné potraviny a nápoje
da: Plantebaserede føde- og drikkevarer, Plantebaserede fødevarer og drikkevarer
de: Pflanzliche Lebensmittel und Getränke
el: Τρόφιμα και ποτά φυτικής προέλευσης
eo: Plant-bazitaj manĝaĵoj kaj trinkaĵoj
es: Alimentos y bebidas de origen vegetal
et: Taimsed toidud ja joogid
fa: غذاها و نوشیدنی‌های گیاهی
fi: Kasvipohjaiset ruoat ja juomat
fr: Aliments et boissons à base de végétaux
he: מזונות ומשקאות על בסיס צמחי
hi: पौधे आधारित खाद्य पदार्थ और पेय
hr: Biljne hrane i pića
hu: Növényi alapú élelmiszerek és italok
id: Makanan dan minuman nabati
it: Cibi e bevande a base vegetale
ja: 植物性食品と飲料
ko: 식물성 식품 및 음료
lt: Augalinės kilmės maisto produktai ir gėrimai
mk: Храна и пијалоци од растително потекло
ms: Makanan dan minuman berasaskan tumbuhan
nl: Plantaardige levensmiddelen en dranken
no: Plantebaserte matvarer og drikkevarer, Plantebaserte mat- og drikkevarer, Plantebasert mat og drikke
pl: Żywność i napoje na bazie roślin
pt: Alimentos e bebidas à base de plantas
ro: Alimente și băuturi pe bază de plante
ru: Еда и напитки из растительного сырья
sk: Rastlinné potraviny a nápoje
sl: Rastlinska hrana in pijače
sv: Växtbaserade livsmedel, Växtbaserad mat och dryck
th: อาหารและเครื่องดื่มจากพืช
tr: Bitkisel yiyecek ve içecekler, Bitki kaynaklı yiyecek ve içecekler, Bitki yiyecek ve içecekleri
uk: Їжа та напої на рослинній основі
zh: 植物性食物与饮品

en: Plant-based foods
ar: الأطعمة النباتية
az: Bitki mənşəli qidalar
bg: Растителни храни
ca: Aliments amb base vegetal
cs: Rostlinné potraviny
da: Plantebaserede fødevarer
de: Pflanzliche Lebensmittel
el: Τρόφιμα φυτικής προέλευσης
eo: Plant-bazitaj manĝaĵoj
es: Alimentos de origen vegetal, Alimentos vegetales, Vegetales y derivados
et: Taimsed toidud
fa: غذاهای گیاهی
fi: Kasvipohjaiset ruoat
fr: Aliments d'origine végétale, Aliments à base de plantes, Végétaux et dérivés
he: מזונות מהצומח
hi: पौधे आधारित खाद्य पदार्थ
hr: Hranu biljnog podrijetla
hu: Növényialapú élelmiszerek
id: Makanan nabati
it: Cibi a base vegetale
ja: 植物性食品
ko: 식물성 식품
lt: Augalinės kilmės maisto produktai
mk: Храна од растително потекло
ms: Makanan berasaskan tumbuhan
nl: Plantaardige levensmiddelen
no: Plantebasert mat
pl: Żywność na bazie roślin
pt: Alimentos à base de plantas
ro: Alimente pe bază de plante
ru: Еда из растительного сырья
sk: Rastlinné potraviny
sl: Rastlinska hrana
sv: Växtbaserad mat
th: ผลิตภัณฑ์จากพืชทั้งหมด
tr: Bitkisel yiyecekler, Bitki kaynaklı yiyecekler, Bitki yiyecekleri
uk: Їжа на рослинній основі
zh: 植物性食物

en: Vegetable-based foods and beverages
de: Gemüse basierte Lebensmittel und Getränke
es: Comida y bebida vegetal
fi: Vihannespohjaiset ruoat ja juomat
fr: Aliments et boissons à base de légumes
he: מזון ומשקאות מבוססי צמחים, מזון ומשקאות צמחוניים, מזון ומשקאות צמחיים, אוכל ומשקאות מבוססי צמחים, אוכל ומשקאות צמחוניים, אוכל ומשקאות צמחיים
hr: Hranu i piće na bazi povrća
it: Cibi e bevande a base de verduras
nl: Voedsel en dranken op basis van groenten
pl: Żywność i napoje na bazie warzyw
pt: Alimentos e bebidas à base de vegetais
ro: Alimente și băuturi pe bază de legume
sv: Grönsaksbaserade livsmedel
zh: 蔬菜类食品及饮料

en: Fruit-based foods and beverages, Fruits and derived products, Fruits and their products
ca: Aliments i begudes amb base de fruites
da: Frugtbaserede føde- og drikkevarer
de: Fruchtbasierte Lebensmittel und Fruchtgetränke
es: Comida y bebida a base de frutas, Frutas y sus productos, Frutas y derivados
fr: Aliments et boissons à base de fruits, Fruits et produits dérivés, fruits et dérivés
hr: Hranu i piće na bazi voća
it: Cibi e bevande a base di fruta
lt: Vaisiai ir jų produktai
nl: Fruit en afgeleide producten
pl: Żywność i napoje na bazie owoców, Produkty na bazie owoców, Owoce i produkty owocowe
pt: Alimentos e bebidas à base de frutas
sv: Fruktbaserade livsmedel, Fruktbaserad mat och dryck